Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 1 General Provisions
4-51-130. Ineligibilty.

No member of the general assembly, the governor, a member of the governor's cabinet or a cabinet-level member of the governor's staff shall serve as a director or employee of the corporation while holding such position in state government.

No member of the general assembly, the governor, a member of the governor's cabinet or a cabinet-level member of the governor's staff shall serve as an employee, or otherwise receive compensation or other benefit for consultation or services rendered directly or indirectly through a partnership, corporation or other business entity, from an on-line or instant ticket lottery vendor of the Tennessee education lottery corporation or an on-line or instant ticket lottery vendor seeking to become a vendor of the Tennessee education lottery corporation, while holding such position in state government. Nothing in this subsection (b) shall be construed as prohibiting continued employment of such official by a partnership, corporation, or other business entity receiving compensation from an on-line or instant ticket lottery vendor if:

Such official has no direct or indirect contact with an on-line or instant ticket lottery vendor; and

Such official does not share in any compensation or any benefit received from an on-line or instant ticket lottery vendor.

This section shall not apply to any employee of the corporation or of an on-line or instant ticket lottery vendor who, subsequent to such employment, seeks election to the general assembly or the office of governor. No provision of this subsection (c) shall be construed as prohibiting such employee from continuing in such employment during the individual's term in office as a member of the general assembly.

This section also applies to any children residing in the primary residence and the spouse of any member of the general assembly, the governor, a member of the governor's cabinet or a cabinet-level member of the governor's staff.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor punishable only by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Attorney General Opinions. Legislator's conflict of interest: lottery advertising, OAG 04-002, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 2 (1/06/04).

4-51-131. Corporation participation in the Tennessee consolidated retirement system.

The Tennessee education lottery corporation shall be eligible to be a participating employer in the Tennessee consolidated retirement system upon:

Passage of a resolution by the corporation's board of directors authorizing an actuarial study; and

Passage of a resolution by the corporation's board of directors authorizing such participation and accepting the liability as a result of the participation by its full-time employees.

The employees of the corporation shall make the same contributions, participate in the same manner, and shall be eligible for the same benefits as employees of local governments participating in the retirement system under this part.

The employees shall be entitled to credit for prior service as approved by the board of directors of the corporation under the same provisions that apply to employees of local governments.

The retirement system shall not be liable for the payment of retirement allowances or other payments on account of employees of the corporation or their beneficiaries for which reserves have not been previously created from funds contributed by the corporation, its employees or the corporation and its employees.

In case of the withdrawal of the corporation as a participating employer, the benefits of the members and beneficiaries shall be determined in accordance with § 8-35-211.

It is the legislative intent that the state shall realize no increased cost as a result of this section. All costs associated with retirement coverage, including administrative costs, shall be the responsibility of the corporation.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 4.

Cross-References. Law enforcement efforts, §39-15-413.

Lotteries, Tenn. Const., art. XI, § 5.

Lotteries, chain letters and pyramid clubs, §39-17-506.

Lottery not gambling, §8-47-127.

Lottery sales, title 39, ch. 17, part 6.

Possession of gambling device or record, forfeiture, §39-17-505.

State lottery proceeds, title 49, ch. 4, part 9.

Tennessee Lottery Funds for Education Projects Loan Act of 2003, title 4, chapter 31, part 10.

4-51-132. Preemption.

The general assembly, by enacting this chapter and title 39, chapter 17, part 6, intends to preempt any other regulation of the area covered by this chapter and title 39, chapter 17, part 6. No political subdivision or agency may enact or enforce a law, ordinance, resolution or regulation that regulates or prohibits any conduct in the area covered by this chapter and title 39, chapter 17, part 6.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2.

4-51-133. List of individuals collecting more than $3,500.

On a monthly basis, the Tennessee education lottery corporation shall provide to the department of human services the following information of any individual collecting a prize of more than three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500):

Name;

Prize amount; and

Any other available identifying information.

Acts 2017, ch. 191, § 2; 2020, ch. 622, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-51-133 concerned the select committee on the Tennessee Education Lottery Corporation.

Acts 2017, ch. 191, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Program lntegrity Act of 2017.”

4-51-134. Participation in “Amber Alert.”

The Tennessee education lottery corporation shall formulate and implement a plan, in cooperation with the Tennessee bureau of investigation, for the Tennessee lottery's participation in the state's AMBER ALERT program via on-line lottery ticket terminals and all other appropriate media and technology at the corporation's disposal.

Acts 2004, ch. 841, § 5.

4-51-135. Immunity of corporation — Corporation employees considered state employees — Property and casualty insurance.

The corporation is immune from all tort causes of action. Notwithstanding § 4-51-101(c) or any other law to the contrary, the corporation shall be considered a state agency for purposes of title 9, chapter 8, parts 3 and 4; provided, that the corporation shall not be considered a state agency for purposes of contract and workers' compensation actions. Actions for workers' compensation and contract actions, as provided in this chapter, may be brought against the corporation only in the chancery court for Davidson County.

Corporation employees shall be considered state employees for purposes of §§ 8-42-103, 9-8-112 and 9-8-307; provided, that such employees shall not be considered state employees for workers' compensation coverage, pursuant to § 9-8-307(a)(1)(K).

The corporation shall have the authority to participate in the department of treasury's property/casualty risk program pursuant to title 12, chapter 4, part 10, for all buildings and building contents owned by the corporation, or that the corporation is contractually obligated to insure.

The corporation shall pay to the state, as a premium, any contribution required by the risk management fund under this section.

It is the legislative intent that the state shall incur no additional liability as a result of this section.

This section additionally applies to those activities of the corporation relating to sports wagering under the Tennessee Sports Gaming Act, compiled in part 3 of this chapter.

Acts 2005, ch. 417, § 7; 2019, ch. 507, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

4-51-136. Lottery ticket litter reduction program.

The corporation shall establish a lottery ticket litter reduction program. In development of the program, the corporation is encouraged to examine successful litter reduction and recycling programs as established in other jurisdictions, including, but not limited to, the use of second chance drawings, nonwinning ticket collection incentives and other promotional recycling activities.

Acts 2006, ch. 893, § 1.

Cross-References. Litter control, title 39, ch. 14, part 5.

4-51-137. Establishment of mechanism for lottery ticket winner to make charitable contribution.

The board, in coordination with the secretary of state, shall establish a mechanism whereby a lottery ticket winner of a drawing-style game may, upon redemption of prize money of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more, make a charitable contribution of ten percent (10%) of the total prize money, either before taxes or after payment of taxes and fees, to a 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(19) nonprofit organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)) or Section 501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(19)), as applicable. The board shall carry out its duties under this section no later than January 1, 2019. This section does not apply to instant or scratch-off games.

Acts 2018, ch. 1022, § 1.